Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.480

Watershed restoration projects—Permit processing.

A permit required by the department for a watershed restoration project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in compliance with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510.

[ 1995 c 378 s 13. Formerly RCW 43.30.410.]